Washington statutes.
RCW 7.28.140

Verdict of jury.

The jury by their verdict shall find as follows:

(1) If the verdict be for the plaintiff, that he or she is entitled to the possession of the property described in the complaint, or some part thereof, or some undivided share or interest in either, and the nature and duration of his or her estate in such property, part thereof, or undivided share or interest, in either, as the case may be.

(2) If the verdict be for the defendant, that the plaintiff is not entitled to the possession of the property described in the complaint, or to such part thereof as the defendant defends for, and the estate in such property or part thereof, or license, or right to the possession of either established on the trial by the defendant, if any, in effect as the same is required to be pleaded.

[ 2011 c 336 s 174; Code 1881 s 540; 1877 p 113 s 544; 1869 p 129 s 492; RRS s 795.]

NOTES:

Rules of court: CR 49.

General, special verdicts: RCW 4.44.410 through 4.44.440.